District of Columbia statutes.
47-1076

Heurich House Foundation; Lot 79, Square 115.

[Not funded].

History

Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-88, § 2(b), 54 DCR 11916

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Heurich House Foundation Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-267, January 24, 2008, 55 DCR 1496).

Editor's Notes

Section 4 of D.C. Law 17-88 provided that this act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 17-88 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 17-88, are not in effect.